Washington statutes.
RCW 36.83.020

Establishment—Notice, hearing—Termination of proceedings—Modification of boundaries—Dissolution.

(1) A county legislative authority proposing to establish a service district shall conduct a hearing at the time and place specified in a notice published at least once, not less than ten days prior to the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation within the proposed service district. This notice shall be in addition to any other notice required by law to be published. The notice shall specify the functions or activities proposed to be provided or funded by the service district. Additional notice of the hearing may be given by mail, posting within the proposed service district, or in any manner the county legislative authority deems necessary to notify affected persons. All hearings shall be public and the county legislative authority shall hear objections from any person affected by the formation, modification of the boundaries, or dissolution of the service district.

(2) Following the hearing held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the county legislative authority may establish a service district if the county legislative authority finds the action to be in the public interest and adopts an ordinance or resolution providing for the establishment of the service district. The legislation establishing a service district shall specify the functions or activities to be exercised or funded and establish the boundaries of the service district. Functions or activities proposed to be provided or funded by the service district may not be expanded beyond those specified in the notice of hearing, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) At any time prior to the county legislative authority establishing a service district pursuant to this section, all further proceedings shall be terminated upon the filing of a verified declaration of termination signed by a majority of the registered voters of the proposed service district.

(4) With the approval of the county legislative authority, the governing body of a service district may modify the boundaries of, expand or otherwise modify the functions of, or dissolve the service district after providing notice and conducting a public hearing or hearings in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section. The governing body must make a determination that the proposed action is in the public interest and adopt a resolution providing for the action.

[ 1996 c 292 s 2; 1983 c 130 s 2.]